Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.33, subdivision 8a, is amended to read: Subd. 8a. Electronic transmission. (a) deleted text begin Ifdeleted text end new text begin Subject to section 168A.50, subdivision 2, paragraph (d),new text end the commissioner deleted text begin acceptsdeleted text end new text begin may accept, and beginning October 1, 2027, must accept,new text end electronic transmission of a motor vehicle transfer and registrationnew text begin or other document required under this chapternew text end bynew text begin (1)new text end a new or used motor vehicle dealer,new text begin and (2) a user authorized by the commissioner.new text end new text begin (b)new text end A deputy registrar who is equipped with electronic transmission technology and trained in its use must deleted text begin receive the filing fee provided for in subdivision 7 anddeleted text end review the transfer of each new or used motor vehicle to determine its genuineness and regularity before issuance of a certificate of title, and must receive and retain the filing fee under subdivision 7, paragraph (a), clause (2). deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner must establish reasonable performance, security, technical, and financial standards to approve companies that provide computer software and services to motor vehicle dealersnew text begin and other authorized usersnew text end to electronically transmit vehicle title transfer and registration informationnew text begin and documentsnew text end . An approved company must be offered access to department facilities, staff, and technology on a fair and reasonable basis. An approved company must not have an ownership interest with a deputy registrar or a driver's license agent. An approved company is not eligible to be appointed by the commissioner as a deputy registrar or a driver's license agent. new text begin (d) A person who transmits a physical document in electronic form must retain the physical document in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. Information or a document that is not produced in physical form is not required to be converted to physical form and must be retained for a period of time as determined by the commissioner. Subject to section 168A.50, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), a person who transmits a document electronically as provided under this subdivision is not required to provide the document in physical form to the commissioner or a deputy registrar as a routine course of business. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.06, is amended to read: 168A.06 DELIVERY OF CERTIFICATE. new text begin (a) new text end Thenew text begin commissioner must deliver anew text end certificate of title deleted text begin must be delivereddeleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) before October 1, 2027,new text end to the owner named in deleted text begin it. Secured parties, if any, must be mailed notification of their security interest filed.deleted text end new text begin the certificate; ornew text end new text begin (2) on or after October 1, 2027, by electronic transmission to the first secured party named in the certificate, or by mail to the named owner if there is no secured party. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must notify any other secured parties of a secured party's security interest and of an electronic transmission under this section. new text end new text begin (c) For a certificate of title electronically transmitted to a secured party, the commissioner must notify the owner that a security interest has been filed and that the certificate of title has been delivered to a secured party and must issue a confirmation of ownership document to the owner. A confirmation of ownership document is not a certificate of title and may not be used to transfer ownership of the vehicle. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application, issuance, form, bond, and notice. (a) In the event a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or becomes illegible, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the certificate may submit an application to the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end or a deputy registrar for a duplicate in a format prescribed by the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end .new text begin Subject to subdivision 5,new text end the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end ornew text begin anew text end deputy registrar must issue a duplicate certificate of titlenew text begin and provide notifications in conformance with section 168A.06new text end if satisfied that the applicant is entitled to the duplicate certificate of title. deleted text begin The duplicate certificate of title must be plainly marked as a duplicate and mailed or delivered to the owner.deleted text end The deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end ornew text begin anew text end deputy registrar must indicate in the driver and vehicle information system records that a duplicate certificate of title has been issued. As a condition to issuing a duplicate certificate of title, the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end may require a bond from the applicant in the manner and format prescribed in section 168A.07, subdivision 1, clause (2). new text begin (b)new text end The duplicate certificate of title mustnew text begin be plainly marked as a duplicate andnew text end contain the legend: "This duplicate certificate of title may be subject to the rights of a person under the original certificate." deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner must allow duplicate certificate of title issuance by a deputy registrar, subject to procedures established by the commissioner. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.09, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Issuance with security interest. new text end new text begin For an original certificate of title issued on or after October 1, 2027, the commissioner or a deputy registrar must not issue a duplicate certificate of title when a security interest is present unless the applicant presents satisfactory evidence that the security interest has been satisfied or the applicant is the security interest holder. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.14, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 20, section 164, is amended to read: 168A.14 NEW CERTIFICATES ISSUED, OLD CERTIFICATES SURRENDERED. Subdivision 1. New certificate after assignment. deleted text begin The department,deleted text end Upon receipt of a properly assigned certificate of title, with an application for a new certificate of title, the required fees and taxes, and any other documents required by law, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin the commissioner mustnew text end issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as owner and list any secured party named on deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the certificatenew text end and deleted text begin deliver it to the owner. The secured party or parties must be issued a notification that the security interest has been fileddeleted text end new text begin must perform issuances and notifications as provided in section 168A.06new text end . Subd. 1a. New certificate after security interest filed. deleted text begin The department,deleted text end Upon receipt of an affidavit as provided in section 524.3-1201, paragraph (a), an application for a new certificate of title, and any required fee, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin the commissioner mustnew text end issue a new certificate of title in the name of the successor as ownerdeleted text begin , listingdeleted text end new text begin and listnew text end any secured party on deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the certificate and must perform issuances and notifications as provided in section 168A.06new text end . deleted text begin The department shall deliver the certificate to the successor and shall issue any secured party a notification that the security interest has been filed.deleted text end Subd. 2. New certificate after nonvoluntary transfer. deleted text begin The department,deleted text end Upon receipt of an application for a new certificate of title by a transferee other than by voluntary transfer, with proof of the transfer, the required fees and taxes, and any other documents required by law, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin the commissioner mustnew text end issue a new certificate of title in the name of the transferee as ownernew text begin and must perform issuances and notifications as provided in section 168A.06new text end . Subd. 3. Surrendered certificate. The deleted text begin department shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end file and retain for seven years every surrendered certificate of title, the file to be maintained so as to permit the tracing of title of the vehicle. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.18, is amended to read: 168A.18 DUTIES OF PARTIES RELATING TO SECURITY INTEREST. new text begin (a) The requirements under this section apply new text end if an owner creates a security interest in a vehicledeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The owner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately execute the application in the space provided deleted text begin therefordeleted text end on the certificate of title, or in a format the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end prescribes, to name the secured party on the certificate, showing the name and address of the secured party, and cause the certificate, application, and the required fees and taxes to be delivered to the secured party. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end immediately cause the certificate, application, and the required fees and taxes to be mailed or delivered to the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A second or subordinate secured party does not affect the rights of the first secured party under a security agreement. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Upon receipt of the certificate of title, application, and the required fees and taxes, the deleted text begin department shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end issue a new certificate containing the name and address of the new secured partydeleted text begin ,deleted text end and deleted text begin mail or deliver the certificate to the owner. The secured party or parties shall be notified that the security interest has been recordeddeleted text end new text begin must perform issuances and notifications as provided in section 168A.06new text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.20, is amended to read: 168A.20 SATISFACTION OF SECURITY INTEREST. Subdivision 1. Certificate with latest secured party; release. new text begin (a) new text end Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the secured party, new text begin including a certificate of title electronically transmitted to or held by a secured party, new text end the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a release of security interest in the deleted text begin space provided therefor on the certificate or as the department prescribes, and mail ordeleted text end deleted text begin deliver the certificate and releasedeleted text end new text begin manner prescribed by the commissioner and must:new text end new text begin (1) before October 1, 2027, deliver the certificate and releasenew text end to the next secured party named deleted text begin thereindeleted text end new text begin on the certificate of titlenew text end , or if none, to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the certificatenew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) comply with requirements in subdivision 6new text end . new text begin (b) Following a release of security interest under paragraph (a), clause (1),new text end the owner, other than a dealer holding the vehicle for resale, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end promptly cause the certificate and release, together with the required fees and taxes, to be mailed or delivered to the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end , deleted text begin which shalldeleted text end new text begin and the commissioner mustnew text end release the secured party's rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate. Subd. 2. Certificate with prior secured party; release. new text begin (a) new text end Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of a prior secured party, the secured party whose security interest is satisfied deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a releasenew text begin of security interestnew text end in the deleted text begin format the department prescribesdeleted text end new text begin manner prescribed by the commissionernew text end and deleted text begin deliver the releasedeleted text end new text begin must:new text end new text begin (1) before October 1, 2027, deliver the releasenew text end to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the release; ornew text end new text begin (2) comply with requirements in subdivision 6new text end . new text begin (b) Following a release of security interest under paragraph (a), clause (1),new text end the secured party in possession of the certificate of title deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end eithernew text begin : (1)new text end deliver the certificate to the owner, or the person authorized by the owner, for delivery to the deleted text begin department,deleted text end new text begin commissioner;new text end ornew text begin (2)new text end upon receipt of the release, mail or deliver deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the releasenew text end with the certificate to the deleted text begin department, which shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner. The commissioner mustnew text end release the subordinate secured party's rights on the certificate or issue a new certificate. Subd. 3. Certificate with owner. new text begin (a) new text end Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the owner, the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, execute a release of security interest in the deleted text begin formatdeleted text end new text begin mannernew text end prescribed by the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end and deleted text begin mail or deliver the notification with releasedeleted text end new text begin must:new text end new text begin (1) before October 1, 2027, deliver the notification with releasenew text end to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the releasenew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) comply with requirements in subdivision 6new text end . new text begin (b)new text end The secured party may notify the deleted text begin registrardeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end of the satisfaction of lien in a manner prescribed by the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . Subd. 4. Satisfaction of lien for child support; release. If the secured party is a public authority or a child support or maintenance obligee with a lien under section 168A.05, subdivision 8, upon either new text begin (1) new text end the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle for which the certificate of title is in the possession of the owner, or new text begin (2) new text end the execution by the owner of a written payment agreement determined to be acceptable by the court, a child support magistrate, the public authority, or the obligee, within 15 days, or seven days if satisfied by a dealer licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2, 3, or 4, the secured party deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end execute a release of security interest in the deleted text begin formatdeleted text end new text begin mannernew text end prescribed by the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end and deleted text begin mail or deliver the notification with releasedeleted text end new text begin must:new text end new text begin (1) before October 1, 2027, deliver the notification with releasenew text end to the owner or any person who delivers to the secured party an authorization from the owner to receive the releasenew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) comply with requirements in subdivision 6new text end . Subd. 5. Satisfaction of automobile lien seven years old; release. A security interest perfected under this chapter may be canceled seven years from the perfection date for a passenger automobile, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, upon the request of the owner of the passenger automobile, if the owner has paid the lien in full and is unable to locate the lienholder to obtain a lien release. At a minimum, the owner must send a letter to the lienholder by certified mail, return receipt requested, requesting a lien release. If the owner is unable to obtain a lien release by sending a letter by certified mail, then the owner must present to the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end or deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin annew text end agent the returned letter as evidence of the attempted contact. This subdivision applies only to: (1) vehicle owners who are individuals; or (2) dealers licensed under section 168.27, subdivision 2 or 3, who are purchasing a vehicle from an individual owner for resale. new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Electronic lien release. new text end new text begin (a) On or after October 1, 2027, the satisfaction of a security interest in a vehicle must be electronically transmitted by the secured party to the commissioner and must include the name and address of the person satisfying the security interest. new text end new text begin (b) When security interests and satisfactions are transmitted electronically, the commissioner may defer issuance of a certificate of title until all security interests have been satisfied. Upon satisfaction of all security interests, the commissioner must mail a clear certificate of title to the owner of the vehicle. In a subsequent transfer of ownership of the motor vehicle, it is presumed that the motor vehicle title is subject to a security interest until the title to be issued pursuant to this subdivision is received by the person satisfying the security interest. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.24, is amended to read: 168A.24 DUTIES AND POWERS OF DEPARTMENT. Subdivision 1. Forms. The deleted text begin department shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificates of title, notices of security interests, and all other notices and forms necessary to carry out the provisions of deleted text begin sections 168A.01 to 168A.31deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end determine the format deleted text begin in whichdeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end the forms deleted text begin will appeardeleted text end . Subd. 2. Powers; rules. The deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end may: (1) make necessary investigations to procure information required to carry out the provisions of deleted text begin sections 168A.01 to 168A.31deleted text end new text begin this chapternew text end ; (2) assign a new identifying number to a vehicle if deleted text begin itdeleted text end new text begin the vehiclenew text end has none, or deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the vehicle'snew text end identifying number is destroyed or obliterated; (3) adopt and enforce such rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of deleted text begin sections 168A.01 to 168A.31deleted text end new text begin this chapter, including but not limited to rules that establish and administer an electronic lien notification and release system that allows alternative methods of proof of satisfaction of a security interestnew text end ; (4) adopt and enforce such rules as the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end may deem necessary or appropriate to require the payment of fees imposed by section 168.54, as a condition for deferring application for a certificate of title by a dealer or secured party in cases provided for in section 168A.11 or 168A.12, subdivision 2; and (5) adopt a rule deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end may require the owner or secured partydeleted text begin , as the case may be,deleted text end to deposit the certificate of title with the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end during the period when the vehicle for which deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end certificate was issued is registered pursuant to section 168.31, subdivision 4, or is subject to the lien imposed by section 168.31, subdivision 6. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Electronic database. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning October 1, 2027, the commissioner must maintain electronic records in the driver and vehicle information system on motor vehicles and manufactured homes, notices and satisfactions of security interests, and title transactions. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, for the records under paragraph (a), a motor vehicle or manufactured home must be identifiable through the name of vehicle owner, title number, and vehicle identification number or manufacturer's motor number, and a title transaction must be identifiable through the vehicle identification number. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Electronic documents. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to section 168A.50, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), the commissioner may accept any record, forms, or documentation provided for under this chapter by electronic means. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may collect email addresses and use email in lieu of the United States Postal Service as a method of notification. The commissioner must send any notice regarding the potential forfeiture or foreclosure of an interest in property via the United States Postal Service. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168A.29, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Amounts. (a) The deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must be paid the following fees: (1) for filing an application for and the issuance of an original certificate of titlenew text begin except as provided in clause (2), including a certificate of title issued to the owner after the certificate was electronically transmitted to a secured party and all security interests have been satisfiednew text end , $8.25, of which $4.15 must be deleted text begin paid intodeleted text end new text begin deposited innew text end the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, and a surcharge of $2.25 must be added to the fee and deleted text begin credited todeleted text end new text begin deposited innew text end the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3; new text begin (2) for application and issuance of a certificate of title that is electronically transmitted to a secured party under section 168A.06, the amounts and in the allocations as specified in clause (1); new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end for each security interest when first noted upon a certificate of title, including the concurrent notation of any assignment deleted text begin thereof and itsdeleted text end new text begin of the security interest and the security interest'snew text end subsequent release or satisfaction, $2, except that no fee is due for a security interest filed by a public authority under section 168A.05, subdivision 8; deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end for each assignment of a security interest when first noted on a certificate of title, unless noted concurrently with the security interest, $1; and deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end for issuing a duplicate certificate of title, $7.25, of which $3.25 must be deleted text begin paid intodeleted text end new text begin deposited innew text end the driver and vehicle services operating account under section 299A.705, subdivision 1, and a surcharge of $2.25 must be added to the fee and deleted text begin credited todeleted text end new text begin deposited innew text end the driver and vehicle services technology account under section 299A.705, subdivision 3. (b) In addition to the fee required under paragraph (a), clause (1), the deleted text begin departmentdeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must be paid $3.50. The additional $3.50 fee collected under this paragraph must be deposited in the deleted text begin special revenue fund and credited to thedeleted text end public safety motor vehicle account established in section 299A.70. Sec. 10. new text begin [168A.50] ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Electronic" has the meaning given in section 325L.02, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (c) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process, attached to or logically associated with a document, form, physical odometer document, or other record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign, agree, or otherwise acknowledge the information and facts to be accurate and correct. new text end new text begin (d) "Physical odometer document" means a physical document that is a certificate of title, secure power of attorney, or reassignment document and contains an odometer disclosure statement printed on paper by a secure printing process or other secure process by any jurisdiction in compliance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, part 580. Physical odometer document excludes any other form or document, even if the document contains a space for an odometer reading. new text end new text begin (e) "Requisite document" means any document, form, physical odometer document, or record required under this chapter or chapter 168. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Acceptance of electronic signatures. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must accept electronic signatures on any requisite document. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must accept a physical odometer document that is converted to an electronic form by imaging, scanning, or similar process, and is subsequently executed by an electronic signature. An electronic document under this paragraph is not an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as the terms are defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 580.03. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must accept any requisite document with electronic signatures by: new text end new text begin (1) electronic means if the commissioner has a process or system available to accept the document by electronic means; or new text end new text begin (2) physical means, such that the document is printed to paper. new text end new text begin (d) For a physical odometer document required to be submitted to the commissioner by physical means, an electronic document created and executed as provided under paragraph (b) must be accompanied by a printed copy of the electronic document and the corresponding physical odometer document in its original format prior to execution by an electronic signature. This paragraph applies if the physical odometer document is: new text end new text begin (1) a certificate of title; or new text end new text begin (2) a secure power of attorney or dealer reassignment that contains physically completed data or information, such as by handwriting or printing, that preceded the execution by electronic signature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements; limitations. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may require: new text end new text begin (1) that a document containing an electronic signature include an indication that the signature is electronic; and new text end new text begin (2) a certification of authenticity, audit trail, or similar statement or proof of assurance. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not: new text end new text begin (1) require an electronic signature process or an electronic signature vendor be certified by the commissioner before accepting a document that is executed by an electronic signature; new text end new text begin (2) require a document that has been executed by an electronic signature to be converted to physical format by printing for any purpose, except when submission by physical means is required; and new text end new text begin (3) impose any additional requirements for an electronic signature except as authorized under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Electronic signature capture system. new text end new text begin (a) The system used to capture an electronic signature must: new text end new text begin (1) be securely maintained; new text end new text begin (2) capture and retain user information, including the Internet Protocol address of the signer and date and time stamp of system access or electronic signature capture; and new text end new text begin (3) retain all information provided to the system for a period of five years. new text end new text begin (b) The system or person granting access to the system used to capture an electronic signature must verify the identity of the user accessing the system. new text end new text begin (c) Information under paragraph (a), clause (3), must be made available to the commissioner, other regulatory agencies, or law enforcement upon request. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Use of electronic signature. new text end new text begin An electronic signature under this section must not be used for any purpose other than as indicated by the signer on the document and must be linked to the respective electronic record to ensure that the signature cannot be excised, copied, or otherwise transferred unless expressly authorized by the signer. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Authority. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section requires, prohibits, or otherwise limits the ability of the commissioner to provide electronic service, process, system, platform, or alternative methods to receiving and transmitting electronic data, documents, or records, including electronic signature capturing or identity verification. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section requires, prohibits, or otherwise limits the commissioner to provide or issue an electronic power of attorney or electronic title, as the terms are defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 580.03. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Application; conflicts. new text end new text begin (a) The requirements in this section apply beginning October 1, 2027, and apply to this chapter and chapter 168. new text end new text begin (b) This section prevails in any conflict arising with another provision in this chapter or chapter 168. The Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, chapter 325L, prevails in any conflict with this section and governs any area not expressly addressed in this section. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin In Minnesota Statutes, chapter 168A, the revisor of statutes must change the phrase "sections 168A.01 to 168A.31" to "this chapter" wherever the phrase appears in statutes. In Minnesota Statutes, section 336.9-311, paragraph (a), clause (2), the revisor must change the phrase "168A.01 to 168A.31" to "chapter 168A." The revisor must make any necessary grammatical changes or changes to sentence structure necessary to preserve the meaning of the text as a result of the changes. new text end